Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201344-6008
Insurer, defined.

Insurer
means an insurer as defined in section 44-103 authorized to transact the business
of insurance, except that insurer does not include health organizations, unincorporated
mutual associations, assessment associations, health maintenance
organizations, prepaid dental service corporations, prepaid limited health
service organizations, monoline mortgage guaranty insurers, monoline financial
guaranty insurers, title insurers, prepaid legal corporations, intergovernmental
risk management pools, and any other kind of insurer to which the application
of the Insurers and Health Organizations Risk-Based Capital Act, in the determination
of the director, would be clearly inappropriate.

Insurer, when referring to life and health insurers, means an insurer
authorized to transact life insurance business and sickness and accident insurance
business specified in subdivisions (1) through (4) of section 44-201, or any
combination thereof, and also
includes fraternal benefit societies authorized to transact business specified
in sections 44-1072 to 44-10,109.

Insurer, when referring to property and casualty insurers, means an
insurer authorized to transact property insurance business and casualty insurance
business specified in subdivisions (5) through (14) and (16) through (20)
of section 44-201, or any combination thereof, and also includes an insurer
authorized to transact insurance business specified in subdivision (4) of
section 44-201 if also authorized to transact insurance business specified
in subdivisions (5) through (14) and (16) through (20) of section 44-201.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 20;

Laws 1994, LB 978, § 35;

Laws 1999, LB 258, § 13;

Laws 2013, LB426, § 3.
September 6, 2013